Nebraska, session 109, LB769.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB769 LB769
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 60-3,163.02, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
is amended to read:
60-3,163.02 The department shall issue the following types of
alternate license plates pursuant to this section and sections 60-3,104,
60-3,163, and 60-3,163.01:
(1) Arbor Day Plates. The department shall design such license
plates in consultation with the Nebraska Statewide Arboretum and a
nonprofit organization holding a certificate of exemption under section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code with a mission to inspire people
to plant, nurture, and celebrate trees. The design of such plates shall
represent the history and importance of Arbor Day in Nebraska. The
designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Arbor Day
Plates is the Home of Arbor Day Plate Cash Fund . A person may apply for
Arbor Day Plates beginning on January 1, 2026;
(2) Breast Cancer Awareness Plates. The department shall design such
license plates to include a pink ribbon and the words "early detection
saves lives" along the bottom of the license plate. The designated
recipient for alternate license plate fees for Breast Cancer Awareness
Plates is the University of Nebraska Medical Center for the breast cancer
navigator program;
(3) Choose Life License Plates. The department shall design such
license plates to reflect support for the protection of Nebraska's
children. The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for
Choose Life License Plates is the Health and Human Services Cash Fund to
supplement federal funds available to the Department of Health and Human
Services for the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program, 42
U.S.C. 601 et seq.;
(4) Czech Heritage Plates. The department, in consultation with the
Czech Honorary Consul of Nebraska, shall design such license plates to
reflect Czech heritage in Nebraska. The designated recipient for
alternate license plate fees for Czech Heritage Plates is the Department
-2-

LB769 LB769
2026 2026
of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund;
(5) Donate Life Plates. The department shall design such license
plates to reflect support for organ and tissue donation, registration as
a donor on the Donor Registry of Nebraska, and the federally designated
organ procurement organization for Nebraska. The designated recipient for
alternate license plate fees for Donate Life Plates is the Organ and
Tissue Donor Awareness and Education Fund;
(6) Down Syndrome Awareness Plates. The department shall design such
license plates to include the words "Down syndrome awareness" inside a
heart-shaped yellow and blue ribbon. The designated recipient for
alternate license plate fees for Down Syndrome Awareness Plates is the
University of Nebraska Medical Center for the Down Syndrome Clinic;
(7) Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around Water Plates. The department shall
design such license plates to include a blue background with the head of
an otter surfacing above water surrounded by the words "Josh the Otter-Be
Safe Around Water". The designated recipient for alternate license plate
fees for Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around Water Plates is the Josh the
Otter-Be Safe Around Water Cash Fund;
(8) Mountain Lion Conservation Plates. The department shall design
such license plates to reflect support for the conservation of the
mountain lion population. The designated recipient for alternate license
plate fees for Mountain Lion Conservation Plates is the Game and Parks
Commission Educational Fund;
(9) Native American Cultural Awareness and History Plates. The
department, in consultation with the Commission on Indian Affairs, shall
design license plates that reflect the unique culture and history of
Native American tribes historically and currently located in Nebraska.
The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Native
American Cultural Awareness and History Plates is the Native American
Scholarship and Leadership Fund;
(10)(a) Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates. The department shall
-3-

LB769 LB769
2026 2026
design such license plates to (i) include the word "Cornhuskers" or
"Huskers" prominently in the design, (ii) use scarlet and cream colors in
the design or such other similar colors as the department determines to
best represent the official team colors of the University of Nebraska
Cornhuskers athletic programs and to provide suitable reflection and
contrast, (iii) use cream or a similar color for the background of the
design and scarlet or a similar color for the printing, and (iv) create a
design reflecting support for the University of Nebraska Cornhuskers
athletic programs in consultation with the University of Nebraska-Lincoln
Athletic Department.
(b) Alphanumeric Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates shall (i) be
consecutively numbered beginning with the number one and use numbers that
are a size that maximizes legibility, and (ii) not use a county
designation or any characters other than numbers on the spirit plates.
(c) Personalized message Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates shall be
issued subject to the same conditions specified for personalized message
license plates in subsection (2) of section 60-3,118. The characters used
shall consist only of letters, numerals, or a combination of letters and
numerals of the same size and design specified in section 60-3,100. A
maximum of seven characters may be used.
(d) Each application for initial issuance or renewal of Nebraska
Cornhusker Spirit Plates shall be accompanied by a fee of seventy
dollars. Fees collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit sixty percent of
the fee to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund and forty percent
of the fee to the designated recipient for alternate license plate fees.
(e) The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for
Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates is the Highway Trust Fund;
(11) Nebraska History Plates. The department shall design such
license plates in consultation with the Nebraska State Historical Society
to reflect the importance of historical preservation in Nebraska and the
-4-

LB769 LB769
2026 2026
value of our shared Nebraska history. The designated recipient for
alternate license plate fees for Nebraska History Plates is the Support
Nebraska History Cash Fund;
(12) Pets for Vets Plates. The department shall design such license
plates to support veterans and companion or therapy pet animals. The
designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Pets for Vets
Plates is the Pets for Vets Cash Fund;
(13) Prostate Cancer Awareness Plates. The department shall design
such license plates to include a light blue ribbon and the words "early
detection saves lives" along the bottom of the license plate. The
designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Prostate Cancer
Awareness Plates is the University of Nebraska Medical Center for the
Nebraska Prostate Cancer Research Program;
(14) Sammy's Superheroes license plates for childhood cancer
awareness. The department shall design such license plates to include a
blue handprint over a yellow ribbon and the words "childhood cancer
awareness". The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for
Sammy's Superheroes license plates for childhood cancer awareness is the
University of Nebraska Medical Center for pediatric cancer research;
(15) Support the Arts Plates. The department shall design such
license plates in consultation with the Nebraska Arts Council to reflect
support for the arts in Nebraska. The designated recipient for alternate
license plate fees for Support the Arts Plates is the Support the Arts
Cash Fund;
(16)(a) Support Our Troops Plates. The department shall design such
license plates to reflect support for troops from all branches of the
armed forces. The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees
for Support Our Troops Plates is the Veterans Employment Program Fund.
(b)(i) Each application for initial issuance or renewal of
alphanumeric Support Our Troops Plates shall be accompanied by a fee of
five dollars. The State Treasurer shall credit five dollars of the fee to
-5-

LB769 LB769
2026 2026
the designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Support Our
Troops Plates.
(ii) Each application for initial issuance or renewal of
personalized message Support Our Troops Plates shall be accompanied by a
fee of seventy dollars. Twenty-five percent of such fee shall be credited
to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund and seventy-five percent of
such fee shall be credited to the designated recipient for alternate
license plate fees for Support Our Troops Plates;
(17) The Good Life Is Outside Plates. The department shall design
such license plates to reflect the importance of safe walking and biking
in Nebraska and the value of our recreational trails. The designated
recipient for alternate license plate fees for The Good Life Is Outside
Plates is the Game and Parks State Park Improvement and Maintenance Fund
for the purpose of trail improvement and maintenance; and
(18) University of Nebraska State Museum License Plates. The
department shall create no more than three designs for such license
plates in consultation with the University of Nebraska and a nonprofit
organization holding a certificate of exemption under section 501(c)(3)
of the Internal Revenue Code with a mission to support the University of
Nebraska in education and research. Such designs shall reflect support
for museums managed by the University of Nebraska, including Ashfall
Fossil Beds, Morrill Hall, and Trailside Museum. The designated recipient
for alternate license plate fees for University of Nebraska State Museum
License Plates is the University of Nebraska State Museum License Plate
Cash Fund. A person may apply for University of Nebraska State Museum
License Plates beginning on January 1, 2027; and
(19) (18) Wildlife Conservation Plates. The department shall create
no more than three designs for such license plates to reflect support for
the conservation of Nebraska wildlife, including sandhill cranes, bighorn
sheep, and ornate box turtles. The designated recipient for alternate
license plate fees for Wildlife Conservation Plates is the Wildlife
-6-

LB769 LB769
2026 2026
Conservation Fund.
Sec. 2. (1) The University of Nebraska State Museum License Plate
Cash Fund is created and shall be administered by the Board of Regents of
the University of Nebraska. The fund shall include money credited
pursuant to section 60-3,163.02, gifts, grants, bequests, private
contributions, and money from any public or private source. Any money in
the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(2) Money in the fund shall be used for promoting understanding,
appreciation, and stewardship of science and natural history through
research, public education, and outreach at museums managed by the
University of Nebraska.
Sec. 3. Original section 60-3,163.02, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-7-